test/src/gt-norm-yamls/mrj-test-N-OLMA_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - олма: # Noun 'an apple/omena'
     олма+N+Sg+Nom: олма
     олма+N+Sg+Gen: олман
     олма+N+Sg+Acc: олмам
     олма+N+Sg+Com: олмаге
     олма+N+Sg+Dat: олмалан
     олма+N+Sg+Ine: олмашты
     олма+N+Sg+Ill: олмашкы
     олма+N+Sg+Lat: олмаэш
     олма+N+Sg+Comp: олмала
     олма+N+Sg+Abe: олмаде
     олма+N+Pl+Nom: олмавлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Gen: олмавлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Acc: олмавлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+Com: олмавлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+Dat: олмавлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Ine: олмавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+Ill: [олмавлӓшкӹ, олмавлӓш]
     олма+N+Pl+Lat: олмавлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+Comp: олмавлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Abe: олмавлӓде
     
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: олмаэм
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: олмаэмӹн
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: олмаэмӹм
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Com: олмаэмге
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: олмаэмлӓн
     олма+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: олмаэштем
     олма+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: олмаэшкем
     олма+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: олмаэшем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: олмаэмлӓ 
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: олмаэмде 
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: олмаэмвлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: олмавлӓэм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: олмавлӓэмӹн
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: олмаэмвлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: олмавлӓэмӹм
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: олмаэмвлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: олмавлӓэмге
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: олмаэмвлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: олмавлӓэмлӓн
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: олмаэмвлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: олмавлӓштем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: олмаэмвлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: олмавлӓшкем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: олмаэмвлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: олмавлӓэшем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: олмаэмвлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: олмавлӓэмлӓ
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: олмаэмвлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: олмавлӓэмде
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: олмаэмвлӓде
